South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4028.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 6-1-320(B) of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (8) for a county council to support a fire protection district in a rural county that was created pursuant to Chapter 19, Title 4, or Chapter 11, Title 6. However, the two-thirds vote of the membership must occur no later than one year of the effective date of this item. A county council only may utilize the provisions of this item once and use of this provision may not result in a greater than a two percent increase in the county's overall fire budget for the previous tax year. Any increased revenue resulting from the suspension of the millage limitation first must be used on a dollar-for-dollar basis to reduce fees or other similar charges that support fire protection. Once all such fees are eliminated, additional revenue must be used to support the fire protection district. For purposes of this subsection, a "rural county" is any county with a population of seventy thousand or less as of the 2020 decennial census that does not have a full-time fire department that is fully supported by the local applicable fire millage. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----